District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1755

Investigation of conduct; suspension or revocation of license; grounds; penalty in lieu of suspension; probationary period; reinstatement.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 17, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(o), 31 DCR 4023
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 8, 32 DCR 30
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-209, § 2(b), 37 DCR 8464
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 38(b), 40 DCR 6311
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-242, § 3(1), (2), 44 DCR 1128
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(s), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1936.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.